District of Columbia statutes.
21-1119

Repealed

Removal from school of nonresidents of the District of Columbia.

Repealed.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 772, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 1087, Pub. L. 91-490, § 2(a)(2)
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(e)(10), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 21-1119.
1973 Ed., § 21-1119.
Functions of the Department of Public Welfare were transferred to the Director of the Department of Human Resources by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969, as amended by Commissioner’s Order No. 70-83, dated March 6, 1970. The Department of Human Resources was replaced by the Department of Human Services by Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, dated February 21, 1980.
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.